Utah statutes.
32B-9-403.   Director's power to issue temporary beer event permit.

(1)  Before a person may sell, offer for sale, or furnish beer at retail for on-premise consumption at an event, the person shall obtain in accordance with this part:

(a)  a single event permit; or

(b) (i)  a temporary beer event permit; and

(ii) (A)  a beer permit issued by the local authority as provided in Section 32B-9-404; or

(B)  written consent of the local authority to sell beer at retail for on-premise consumption at the event.

(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (4), the director may issue a temporary beer event permit to allow the sale, offering for sale, or furnishing of beer for on-premise consumption only at an event that does not last longer than 30 days.

(b)  A temporary beer event permit authorizes, for a period not to exceed 30 days, the storage, sale, offer for sale, furnishing, and consumption of beer at an event.

(c)  If a person obtains a temporary beer event permit for an event that lasts no longer than 30 days, an on-premise beer retailer license is not required for the sale of beer at the event.

(3) (a)  The director may not issue a temporary beer event permit to a person if the aggregate of the days that the person is authorized to store, sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product under a temporary beer event permit will exceed a total of 90 days in any one calendar year.

(b)  The director may not issue, and a person may not obtain, a temporary beer event permit to avoid or attempt to avoid the requirement to be licensed under Chapter 6, Part 7, On-premise Beer Retailer License.

(4)  Before the director issues or denies the issuance of a temporary beer event permit under this section, the director shall comply with Section 32B-9-202.

